Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2201
Act, how cited.

Sections 21-2201 to 21-2222 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Professional Corporation Act.

Laws 1969, c. 121, § 1, p. 555;

Laws 1994, LB 488, § 1.